New York, session 2025-2026, S8689.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (e) and (f) of subdivision 2 of section 203 of 2 the elder law are amended and a new paragraph (g) is added to read as 3 follows: 4 (e) operation of multi-service centers; [and] 5 (f) retired senior volunteer programs[.]; and 6 (g) transportation services. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14360-01-6